Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2451
Control-share acquisition; voting rights of shares.

Shares acquired in a control-share acquisition shall have the same voting rights as other shares of the same class or series in all elections of directors but shall have voting rights on all other matters only if approved by a vote of shareholders of the issuing public corporation at a special or annual meeting of shareholders pursuant to the Shareholders Protection Act and, to the extent so approved, shall have the same voting rights as other shares of the same class or series. Any such control-share acquisition shall be approved by (1) the affirmative vote of the holders of a majority of the shares entitled to vote which are not interested shares and (2) in the case of any shares entitled to vote as a class, the affirmative vote of the holders of a majority of the shares of such class which are not interested shares.

Any shares acquired in a control-share acquisition which do not have voting rights accorded to them by approval of a resolution of shareholders shall regain such voting rights on transfer to a person, other than the acquiring person or any affiliate or associate of the acquiring person, unless the acquisition of the shares by the other person constitutes a control-share acquisition, in which case the voting rights of the shares shall be subject to the Shareholders Protection Act.

Laws 1988, LB 1110, § 21.